Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1784YH (4) 91 jm/jh H.F. 111 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 422.12F Advanced registered nurse 1 preceptor tax credit. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âClinical practicumâ means a course of study designed 5 for the preparation of becoming an advanced registered nurse 6 practitioner, involving clinical preceptorships for practical 7 application of previously studied theory. 8 b. âClinical preceptorshipâ means a mentoring experience 9 under the direction of a nursing program where a preceptor is 10 used to provide a clinical learning experience for a student 11 enrolled in the nursing program. 12 c. âNursing programâ means a program approved by the board 13 of nursing pursuant to section 152.5. 14 d. âPreceptorâ means an advanced registered nurse 15 practitioner who is currently licensed as a registered nurse 16 under chapter 152 or chapter 152E, and who is licensed by the 17 board as an advanced registered nurse practitioner. 18 e. âStudentâ means a resident enrolled in a nursing program 19 fulfilling a required clinical practicum through a clinical 20 preceptorship. 21 2. To be eligible for the tax credit under this section for 22 a tax year, a preceptor must provide uncompensated instruction 23 and supervision during the required student clinical 24 preceptorship, be employed at the clinical facility where the 25 preceptorship occurs, be qualified for the preceptor role, 26 be selected by the nursing program in collaboration with the 27 clinical facility to participate in the clinical preceptorship, 28 and have at least one year of experience in the preceptor role. 29 3. The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less credits 30 allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by an advanced 31 registered nurse preceptor tax credit equal to five hundred 32 dollars per clinical preceptorship where at least one hundred 33 hours of clinical learning experience is provided, not to 34 exceed two thousand dollars in the aggregate. 35 -1- LSB 1784YH (4) 91 jm/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 111 4. Any credit in excess of the tax liability is not 1 refundable and shall not be credited to a following tax year or 2 carried back to a previous tax year. 3 5. The preceptor shall be responsible for accurate 4 documentation of the studentâs experience during the clinical 5 preceptorship including the name of the student, the name 6 of the nursing program, the dates and times instruction and 7 supervision were provided to the student, and the year of the 8 studentâs expected graduation from the program. 9 6. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 10 to administer this section. 11 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to tax years 12 beginning on or after January 1, 2026. 13